eng.foma
# Our lexicon

read lexc eng.lexc
define Lex

def C [b|c|d|f|g|h|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w];

# Define sibilants orthographically
def Sib [s | s h | z | x | c h ];

# e-epenthesis rule: bus+s > buses, etc.
def ERule "+" -> e || Sib _ Sib ;
def YRule y -> i e || C _ "+" ;
def Cleanup "+" -> 0 ;

def Grammar Lex .o. ERule .o. YRule .o. Cleanup ;
regex Grammar;
